Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.230

Authority of corporation or association to acquire stock of bank or national banking association.

(1) A corporation or association organized under the laws of this state or licensed to transact business in the state may acquire any or all shares of stock of any bank or national banking association. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the merger, consolidation, or reorganization of a bank in accordance with this title.

(2) Unless the terms of this section or RCW 30A.04.232 are complied with, an out-of-state bank holding company shall not acquire more than five percent of the shares of the voting stock or all or substantially all of the assets of a bank or national banking association the principal operations of which are conducted within this state.

(3) As used in this section a "bank holding company" means a company that is a bank holding company as defined by the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1841 et seq.). An "out-of-state bank holding company" is a bank holding company that principally conducts its operations outside this state, as measured by total deposits held or controlled by its bank subsidiaries on the date on which it became a holding company. A "domestic bank holding company" is a bank holding company that principally conducts its operations within this state, as measured by total deposits held or controlled by its bank subsidiaries on the date on which it became a bank holding company.

(4) Any such acquisition referred to under subsection (2) of this section by an out-of-state bank holding company requires the express written approval of the director. Approval shall not be granted unless and until the following conditions are met:

(a) An out-of-state bank holding company desiring to make an acquisition referred to under subsection (2) of this section and the bank, national banking association, or domestic bank holding company parent thereof, if any, proposed to be acquired shall file an application in writing with the director. The director shall by rule establish the fee schedule to be collected from the applicant in connection with the application. The fee shall not exceed the cost of processing the application. The application shall contain such information as the director may prescribe by rule as necessary or appropriate for the purpose of making a determination under this section. The application and supporting information and all examination reports and information obtained by the director and the director's staff in conducting its investigation shall be confidential and privileged and not subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW. The application and information may be disclosed to federal bank regulatory agencies and to officials empowered to investigate criminal charges, subject to legal process, valid search warrant, or subpoena. In any civil action in which such application or information is sought to be discovered or used as evidence, any party may, upon notice to the director and other parties, petition for an in camera review. The court may permit discovery and introduction of only those portions that are relevant and otherwise unobtainable by the requesting party. The application and information shall be discoverable in any judicial action challenging the approval of an acquisition by the director as arbitrary and capricious or unlawful.

(b) The director shall find that:

(i) The bank or national banking association that is proposed to be acquired or the domestic bank holding company controlling such bank or national banking association is in such a liquidity or financial condition as to be in danger of closing, failing, or insolvency. In making any such determination the director shall be guided by the criteria developed by the federal regulatory agencies with respect to emergency acquisitions under the provisions of 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1828(c);

(ii) There is no state bank or national banking association doing business in the state of Washington or domestic bank holding company with sufficient resources willing to acquire the entire bank or national banking association on at least as favorable terms as the out-of-state bank holding company is willing to acquire it;

(iii) The applicant out-of-state bank holding company has provided all information and documents requested by the director in relation to the application; and

(iv) The applicant out-of-state bank holding company has demonstrated an acceptable record of meeting the credit needs of its entire community, including low and moderate-income neighborhoods, consistent with the safe and sound operation of such institution.

(c) The director shall consider:

(i) The financial institution structure of this state; and

(ii) The convenience and needs of the public of this state.

(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit, limit, restrict, or subject to further regulation the ownership by a bank of the stock of a bank service corporation or a banker's bank.

[ 2014 c 37 s 124; 2005 c 274 s 252; 1994 c 92 s 22; 1987 c 420 s 2. Prior: 1985 c 310 s 2; 1985 c 305 s 4; 1983 c 157 s 9; 1982 c 196 s 7; 1981 c 89 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 92 s 1; 1961 c 69 s 1; 1955 c 33 s 30.04.230; prior: 1933 c 42 s 10; RRS s 3243-1. Formerly RCW 30.04.230.]

NOTES:

Construction—Effective date—1985 c 310: See notes following RCW 30A.04.232.

Severability—1983 c 157: See note following RCW 30A.04.060.

Severability—1982 c 196: See note following RCW 30A.04.550.

Severability—1981 c 89: See note following RCW 30A.04.180.